src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Proper nouns morphology

## Table of content
* Continuation lexica
* Personal names
- First names
- Surnames
* Place names

* Tunturi # ODD-syllable examples:*
* *Tunturi:* `Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr`
* *Tunturim:* `Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Tunturasse:* `Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Tunturisnie:* `Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine`
* *Tunturistie:* `Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *Tunturinie:* `Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com`
* *Tunturinie:* `Tunturi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess`

* Eira # Even-syllable                   !   Går som MAANA  !    PL+ examples:*
* *Eira:* `Eira+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr` (Eng. ! Går som MAANA ! PL+Nom Eirah)
* *Eiram:* `Eira+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc` (Eng. ! Går som MAANA ! PL+Acc Eiride --> Komp. ikke)
* *Eirese:* `Eira+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill` (Eng. ! Går som MAANA ! PL+Ill Eiride --> Komp. ikke)
* *Eiresne:* `Eira+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine` (Eng. ! Går som MAANA ! PL+Ine Eirine)
* *Eireste:* `Eira+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela` (Eng. ! Går som MAANA ! PL+Ela Eirijste --> Komp. ikke)
* *Eirine:* `Eira+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com` (Eng. ! Går som MAANA ! PL+Com Eirajgujmie)
* *Eirine:* `Eira+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess` (Eng. ! Går som MAANA ! PL+Ess Eirine)

* Anu # Even-syllable                    !   Går som gaalloe !               ! Pl+Nom examples:*
* *Anu:* `Anu+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr` (Eng. ! Går som gaalloe ! Arkivfoto ! Pl+Nom Anuh)
* *Anum:* `Anu+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc` (Eng. ! Går som gaalloe ! Arkivfotom ! Pl+Acc Anujde)
* *Anuse:* `Anu+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill` (Eng. ! Går som gaalloe ! Arkivfotose ! Pl+Ill Anujde)
* *Anusne:* `Anu+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine` (Eng. ! Går som gaalloe ! Arkivfotosne ! Pl+Ine Anujne)
* *Anuste:* `Anu+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela` (Eng. ! Går som gaalloe ! Arkivfotoste ! Pl+Ela Anujste)
* *Anune:* `Anu+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com` (Eng. ! Går som gaalloe ! Arkivfotojne ! Pl+Com Anujgujmie)
* *Anune:* `Anu+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess` (Eng. ! Går som gaalloe ! Arkivfotojne ! Pl+Ess Anujne)

* Ane # Even-syllable                    !   Går som nïejte examples:*
* *Ane:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Anem:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Anese:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Anesne:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Aneste:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Anine:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Anine:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)

* *Anide:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Acc` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte ! -> Kompilerer ikke)
* *Anide:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte ! -> Kompilerer ikke)
* *Anine:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte ! -> Kompilerer ikke)
* *Anijste:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ela` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte ! -> Kompilerer ikke)
* *Anigujmie:* `Ane+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Com` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte ! -> Kompilerer ikke)

* Ally # Even-syllable                  !   Går som y   examples:*
* *Ally:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allym:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allyn:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allyse:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allysne:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allyste:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allyne:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allyne:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess` (Eng. ! Går som nïejte)
* *Allyde:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Acc` (Eng. !)
* *Allyj:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Gen` (Eng. !)
* *Allyde:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill` (Eng. !)
* *Allyne:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ine` (Eng. !)
* *Allyjste:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ela` (Eng. !)
* *Allyjgujmie:* `Ally+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Com` (Eng. !)

* Aunio # Even-syllable                  !   Går som GAALLOE    examples:*
* *Aunio:* `Aunio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Attr` (Eng. ! Går som)
* *Auniom:* `Aunio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc` (Eng. !)
* *Auniose:* `Aunio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill` (Eng. !)
* *Auniosne:* `Aunio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine` (Eng. !)
* *Aunioste:* `Aunio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela` (Eng. !)
* *Aunione:* `Aunio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com` (Eng. !)
* *Aunione:* `Aunio+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess` (Eng. !)

LEXICON LONDON-obj    Objects. ODD-syllable

* Windows # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *Windows:* `Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Attr`
* *Windows:* `Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom`
* *Windowsasse:* `Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill`
* *Windowsistie:* `Windows+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela`

* Courtrai # Even-syllable examples:*
* *Courtrai:* `Courtrai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr`
* *Courtrajjem:* `Courtrai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Courtrajjese:* `Courtrai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Courtrajjesne:* `Courtrai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine`
* *Courtrajjeste:* `Courtrai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *Courtrajjine:* `Courtrai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com`
* *Courtrajjine:* `Courtrai+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess`

* Haukilahti # Even-syllable   POLITI  examples:*
* *Haukilahti:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Haukilahtijjem:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Haukilahtan:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Haukilahtijjese:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Haukilahtijjesne:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine`
* *Haukilahtijjeste:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *Haukilahtijjine:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com`
* *Haukilahtijjine:* `Haukilahti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess`

OBS! Egentlig Mâki og Järvi kan egentlig slås sammen! - MAJA

* Hautajärvi # Even-syllable examples:*
* *Hautajärvi:* `Hautajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Hautajärvim:* `Hautajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Hautajärvan:* `Hautajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Hautajärvesne:* `Hautajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine`
* *Hautajärveste:* `Hautajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *Hautajärvine:* `Hautajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com`
* *Hautajärvine:* `Hautajärvi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ess`

* gata # Even-syllable examples:*
* *Akersgata:* `Akersgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Attr`
* *Akersgatam:* `Akersgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Akersgatese:* `Akersgata+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`

# LEXICON ACCRA-femplc
Propernoun

* gata #  examples:*
* *Abia:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Abian:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen`
* *Abiam:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Abiese:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Abiesne:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine`
* *Abieste:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *Abine:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com`
* *Abine:* `Abia+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess`

the sne / snie business remains to be sorted out.
the sne / snie business remains to be sorted out.

+Pl+Nom:e%>h       FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Acc:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Gen:e%>i       FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ill:e%>ide      FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ine:e%>ine      FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Ela:e%>iste    FINAL1 ;
+Pl+Com:e%>igujmie  FINAL1 ;

+Pl: N_ODD_PL ;     ! normal noun

# LEXICON NIEMI
Propernoun

* propernoun examples:*
* *Ahoniemi:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom`
* *Ahoniemin:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen`
* *Ahoniemim:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc`
* *Ahoneaman:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill`
* *Ahoniemesne:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine`
* *Ahoniemeste:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela`
* *Ahoniemine:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com`
* *Ahoniemine:* `Ahoniemi+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ess`

+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill:%>an                FINAL1 ; !SUB - is this possible? IllSg without Uml in -ie?

+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: NIEJTE_PL ;

+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>igyjmie  FINAL1 ; !

+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl: CNAME_ODD_PL ;     ! name special

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sma/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>

---
